Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 4 C OASTAL MARSHLANDS
12-5-291. Enforcement of part.

In order to enforce this part or any orders issued under this part or any rules and regulations promulgated under this part, any one or any combination of any or all of the following methods may be employed:

Whenever any person not exempted from this part by Code Section 12-5-295 is altering the marshlands without a permit, altering the marshlands in violation of the terms and conditions of a permit, or violating this part in any other manner, the committee may, prior to any hearing, issue a cease and desist order or other appropriate order to such person; provided, however, that the issuance of such order shall not affect the availability of relief under paragraph (4) of this subsection. Any such order becomes final unless the person named therein requests in writing a hearing before a hearing officer appointed by the board no later than ten days after the issuance of such order. Review of such order shall be available as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-283;

Whenever, after a hearing is held in accordance with Code Section 12-5-283 and Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act," at the request of the committee, for the imposition of civil penalties, the administrative law judge determines that any person has failed, neglected, or refused to comply with any provision of this part or any order of the committee or administrative law judge, the administrative law judge may issue an order imposing a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for such violation and an additional civil penalty not to exceed $10,000.00 for each day during which such violation continues. All penalties and interest recovered as provided in this Code section, together with the cost thereof, shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the general fund;

The committee may file in the superior court in the county in which the person under order resides or in the county in which the violation occurred or, if the person is a corporation, in the county in which the corporation maintains its principal place of business a certified copy of the final order of the committee or administrative law judge, unappealed from, or of a final order of the administrative law judge affirmed upon appeal; whereupon the court shall render judgment in accordance therewith and notify the parties. Such judgment shall have the same effect, and all proceedings in relation thereof shall thereafter be the same, as though such judgment has been rendered in an action duly heard and determined by the court;

Whenever the committee, either before or after a hearing, determines that any person is or has been violating any of the provisions of this part or any orders issued under this part or any rules and regulations promulgated under this part, the committee may file a petition for injunction in the proper superior court of this state against such person for the purpose of enjoining such actions or, if appropriate, may make application for a writ of mandamus in the proper superior court of this state against such person for the purpose of compelling the proper performance of his official duty. It shall not be necessary for the committee to allege or prove that it has no adequate remedy at law; and

The superior court, upon finding that any person is or has been violating any of the provisions of this part or any orders issued under this part or any rules and regulations promulgated under this part, may order the person to restore, as nearly as possible, all marshland to the condition existing prior to the alteration of the marshland.

Owners of property with knowledge of unauthorized activities occurring thereon are responsible under this part.

(Ga. L. 1972, p. 991, § 2; Code 1981, §

12-5-288

; Ga. L. 1984, p. 404, § 6; Code 1981, §

12-5-291

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-292. Posting of permit.

A copy of every permit issued to an applicant shall be prominently displayed within the area of proposed activity. If the committee deems it advisable, the applicant may be required to cause a sign to be erected bearing the permit number, date of issuance, name of applicant, and such other information as the committee may reasonably require. The committee may specify the type of sign to be erected and may designate, within reasonable dimensions, the size of the sign.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 8; Code 1981, §

12-5-289

; Code 1981, §

12-5-292

, as redesignated by
Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-293. Effect on permit of sale, lease, or other conveyance of land.

If a permit holder sells, leases, rents, or otherwise conveys the land or any portion thereof for which the permit was issued, and if the permittee has notified the department within 30 days of such transfer or conveyance, such permit shall be continued in force in favor of the new owner, lessee, tenant, or other assignee so long as there is no change in the use of the land as set forth in the original application.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 9; Code 1981, §

12-5-290

; Code 1981, §

12-5-293

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-294. Existence of an emergency; order; right to hearing.

In the event of an emergency, whether created by act of God or by actions of domestic or foreign enemies, or in circumstances where grave peril to human life or welfare exists,
the committee shall issue an order reciting the existence of such an emergency and requiring or allowing that such action be taken as it deems necessary to meet the emergency. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this part to the contrary, such order shall be effective immediately.
If an order requiring a person to take action is issued pursuant to this Code section, such person shall be entitled to a hearing within ten days of the date of issuance of the order.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 12; Code 1981, §

12-5-291

; Code 1981, §

12-5-294

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-295. Applicability of part.

This part shall not apply to the following:

Activities of the Department of Transportation incident to constructing, repairing, and maintaining a public road system in Georgia;

Activities of the Department of Transportation and political subdivisions in maintaining existing drainage systems and ditches as long as such activities do not impact additional marshlands;

Agencies of the United States charged by law with the responsibility of keeping the rivers and harbors of this state open for navigation, and agencies of this state charged by existing law with the responsibility of keeping the rivers and harbors of this state open for navigation including areas for utilization for spoilage designated by such agencies;

Activities of public utility companies regulated by the Public Service Commission, electric membership corporations, public authorities operating electric systems, or municipal electric systems incident to constructing, erecting, repairing, and maintaining utility lines for the transmission of gas, electricity, or telephone messages;

Activities of companies regulated by the Public Service Commission incident to constructing, erecting, repairing, and maintaining railroad lines and bridges;

Activities of political subdivisions incident to constructing, repairing, and maintaining pipelines that have been approved by the department or appropriate authority for the transport of drinking water and sewage;

The building of a private dock exclusively for the noncommercial use of the owner or his or her invitees and constructed on pilings, the walkways of which are above the marsh grass not obstructing tidal flow, by:

The owner of a lot on which a detached single-family residence is located on high land adjoining such dock; or

The owner of a lot having at least 50 front feet of land abutting the marshlands which contains high land suitable for the construction of a detached single-family residence and where the construction of such a residence is not prohibited.

The lot owner shall and is authorized to maintain the structure in good condition and repair the same as necessary, and the use of repair or replacement materials comparable in quality to the original authorized materials shall be sufficient for such purposes;

(7.1) The building of a single private dock by the owners of up to four adjoining lots, each of which is riparian and would qualify for an exemption as provided in paragraph (7) of this Code section, for the exclusive noncommercial use of such owners or their invitees and constructed as a single walkway on pilings above the marsh grass not obstructing tidal flow and in a size to be determined by the department taking into consideration the number of adjoining lots utilizing the dock; provided, however, that the exemption provided by this paragraph shall apply only if each of the owners of such adjoining lots has entered into a binding covenant that runs with the land, in favor of the state, which covenant prohibits the building of any future private dock on his or her lot unless the dock exempted pursuant to this paragraph is removed or converted to a single-family private dock which would qualify for an exemption as provided in paragraph (7) of this Code section. The granting of the exemption provided by this paragraph shall be the state's consideration for the covenant of each such lot owner. The lot owners shall and are authorized to maintain the structure in good condition and repair the same as necessary, and the use of repair or replacement materials comparable in quality to the original authorized materials shall be sufficient for such purposes;

The reclamation of manmade boat slips as a part of any publicly funded construction project and ancillary development projects including, without limitation, hotels, restaurants, retail facilities, and recreational facilities, whether public or private, within any industrial areas continued in existence pursuant to Article XI, Section I, Paragraph IV(d) of the Constitution which are wholly contained on an island; or

The placement of gear for mariculture activities regulated by the department such as anchors, cages, upwellers, and any other gear as the department determines to be required.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 11; Code 1981, §

12-5-292

; Ga. L. 1989, p. 574, § 4; Code 1981, §

12-5-295

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 462, § 2; Ga. L. 2003, p. 316, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 117, § 1/HB 68; Ga. L. 2009, p. 778, § 2/HB 170; Ga. L. 2019, p. 619, § 2/HB 501.)

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 6, 2019, for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations and effective March 1, 2020 for all other purposes, deleted "or" at the end of paragraph (7.1); in paragraph (8), substituted "Paragraph IV(d)" for "Paragraph IV, subparagraph (d)" and added "; or" at the end; and added paragraph (9).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2019, p. 619,

§

3/HB 501, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: "This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law with such approval for purposes of promulgating rules and regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this Act and shall become effective on March 1, 2020, for all other purposes." This Act was signed by the Governor on May 6, 2019.

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey of law on administrative law, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2010).

12-5-296. Criminal violation.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this part shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1970, p. 939, § 10; Code 1981, §

12-5-293

; Code 1981, §

12-5-296

, as redesignated by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)

12-5-297. Liability for damages.

Any person who causes or permits any removal, filling, dredging, or draining or other alteration of marshlands in this state within the estuarine area thereof without first obtaining a permit from the committee shall be liable in damages to the state and any political subdivision thereof for any and all actual or projected costs, expenses, and injuries occasioned by such alteration of the marshlands.
The amount of damages assessed pursuant to this Code section shall include, but shall not be limited to, any actual or projected costs and expenses incurred by the state or any political subdivision thereof in restoring as nearly as possible the natural movement of the waters in the marshlands and replacing the vegetation and aquatic life destroyed by any alteration of marshlands.
Damages to the state shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by the department and shall be paid to the department to cover the cost of restoration.
Damages to a political subdivision shall be recoverable in a civil action instituted by said subdivision.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-297

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2294, § 1.)